es: Corte de la caña del clarinete: Corte americano; Corte europeo; Limada; Corte alemán; Corte de jazz; No limada; Otro
bg-BG: Тип изрязване на тръстиката за кларинет: Американски срез; Европейски срез; Изпилен (filed); Немски срез; Джаз срез; Неизпилен; Друго
en: Clarinet reed cut: American cut; European cut; Filed; German cut; Jazz cut; Unfiled; Other
it: Ancia per clarinetto tagliata: Taglio americano; Taglio europeo; Filed; Taglio tedesco; Taglio jazz; Unfiled; Altro
vi: Kiểu cắt lưỡi kèn clarinet: Kiểu cắt Mỹ; Kiểu cắt Châu Âu; Gọt vỏ; Kiểu cắt Đức; Kiểu cắt Jazz; Không gọt vỏ; Khác
nl: Klarinetriet snede: Amerikaanse snede; Europese snede; Gevijld; Duitse snede; Jazz-snede; Ongevijld; Anders
el: Κοπή καλαμιού κλαρινέτου: Αμερικάνικη κοπή; Ευρωπαϊκή κοπή; Filed; Γερμανική κοπή; Κοπή jazz; Unfiled; Άλλο
da: Type af skæring på klarinetblad: Amerikansk snit; Europæisk snit; Filed; Tysk snit; Jazz-snit; Unfiled; Andet
ru: Тип среза трости для кларнета: Американский срез; Европейский срез; С опиловкой (filed); Немецкий срез; Джазовый срез; Без опиловки (unfiled); Другой
cs: Řez plátku pro klarinet: Americký řez; Evropský řez; Filed; Německý řez; Jazzový řez; Unfiled; Jiné
sl-SI: Rez jezička klarinet: Ameriški rez; Evropski rez; Brušeno; Nemški rez; Jazzovski rez; Nebrušeno; Drugo
ko: 클라리넷 리드 컷: 아메리칸 컷; 유러피안 컷; 파일드; 저먼 컷; 재즈 컷; 언파일드; 기타
zh-TW: 單簧管簧片裁切方式: 美式切工; 歐式切工; 有銼痕; 德式切工; 爵士切工; 無銼痕; 其他
sk-SK: Rez plátku pre klarinet: Americký rez; Európsky rez; S orezom (filed); Nemecký rez; Džezový rez; Bez orezu (unfiled); Iné
hu: Klarinét nádvágása: Amerikai vágású; Európai vágású; Reszelt (filed); Német vágású; Jazz vágású; Reszeletlen (unfiled); Egyéb
ro-RO: Tăietura anciei de clarinet: Tăietură americană; Tăietură europeană; Șlefuită; Tăietură germană; Tăietură jazz; Neșlefuită; Altele
sv: Klarinettrörsskärning: Amerikansk skärning; Europeisk skärning; Filad; Tysk skärning; Jazz-skärning; Ofilad; Annan
nb: Klarinettrørskutt: Amerikansk kutt; Europeisk kutt; Filt; Tysk kutt; Jazz-kutt; Uslipt; Annet
lt-LT: Klarneto liežuvėlio pjūvis: Amerikietiško pjovimo; Europietiško pjovimo; Šlifuotas; Vokiško pjovimo; Džiazo pjovimo; Nešlifuotas; Kita
fr: Coupe de l’anche de clarinette: Coupe américaine; Coupe européenne; Filed; Coupe allemande; Coupe jazz; Unfiled; Autre
de: Schnitt des Klarinettenblatts: Amerikanischer Schnitt; Europäischer Schnitt; Gefeilt; Deutscher Schnitt; Jazz-Schnitt; Ungefeilt; Sonstige
pt-PT: Corte de palheta de clarinete: Corte americano; Corte europeu; Limado; Corte alemão; Corte de jazz; Não limado; Outro
pt-BR: Corte da palheta do clarinete: Corte americano; Corte europeu; Filed; Corte alemão; Corte jazz; Unfiled; Outro
th: รูปทรงของลิ้นคลาริเน็ต: อเมริกันคัต; ยูโรเปียนคัต; ไฟล์ด; เยอรมันคัต; แจ๊สคัต; อันไฟล์ด; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Rez trske za klarinet: Američki rez; Europski rez; S turpijanim rubom; Njemački rez; Jazz rez; Bez turpijanog ruba; Ostalo
zh-CN: 单簧管哨片切割方式: 美式切削; 欧式切削; 带锉痕; 德式切削; 爵士切削; 无锉痕; 其他
tr: Klarnet kamışı kesimi: Amerikan kesim; Avrupa kesim; Törpülü; Alman kesim; Caz kesim; Törpüsüz; Diğer
fi: Klarinetin lehden leikkaustyyli: Amerikkalainen leikkaus; Eurooppalainen leikkaus; Viilattu; Saksalainen leikkaus; Jazz-leikkaus; Viilaamaton; Muu
pl: Cięcie stroika klarnetu: Cięcie amerykańskie; Cięcie europejskie; Szlifowany (filed); Cięcie niemieckie; Cięcie jazzowe; Nieszlifowany (unfiled); Inne
ja: クラリネットリードカット: アメリカンカット; ヨーロピアンカット; ファイルド; ジャーマンカット; ジャズカット; アンファイルド; その他